District of Columbia statutes.
4-1302.06

Challenges to information in Register.

The Mayor shall establish, by rules adopted pursuant to § 2-501 et seq., procedures to permit a person identified in the Child Protection Register to challenge information which he or she alleges is incorrect or establish that a report is unfounded.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title II, § 206, 24 DCR 3341
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-206, § 2(k), 49 DCR 7815
This section is referenced in § 4-1302.07.
1981 Ed., § 6-2116.
1973 Ed., § 6-2116.
D.C. Law 14-206 substituted “incorrect or establish that a report is unfounded” for “incorrect”.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-240, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2753).

For temporary (90 day) delay of the applicability of provisions changing the manner in which the Child and Family Services Agency will process reports of child abuse and neglect, see § 3 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-494, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 9781).
For temporary (90 day) delay of the applicability of provisions changing the manner in which the Child and Family Services Agency will process reports of child abuse and neglect, see § 3 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-603, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 687).
Application of 14-206: Section 16(b) of D.C. Law 14-310 provided that section 2(a)(2), (4), (5), (6), and (7), (b), (c), (d), (e), (h), (i), (j), (k), and (l) of D.C. Law 14-206 shall apply as of October 1, 2003.